Hawaii statutes.
§138-2 Enhanced 911 board. (a) There
is created within the department of accounting and general services, for
administrative purposes, an enhanced 911 board consisting of thirteen voting
members; provided that the membership shall consist of:

(1) The chief information officer or the chief
information officer's designee;

(2) Three representatives from wireless
communications service providers, who shall be appointed by the governor as
provided in section 26-34;

(3) One representative each from the public safety
answering points for Oahu, Hawaii, Kauai, Maui, and Molokai and one
representative, chosen by the mayor of the city and county of Honolulu, who
shall be appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34;

(4) The consumer advocate or the consumer advocate's
designee;

(5) One representative from a communications service
company that offers Interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol services, who
shall be appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34; and

(6) One representative of the public utility
providing telecommunications services and land line enhanced 911 services
through section 269-16.95.

(b) A simple majority shall constitute a
quorum, whose affirmative vote shall be necessary for all actions by the board.

(c) The chairperson of the board shall be
elected by the members of the board by simple majority and shall serve a term
of one year.

(d) The board shall meet upon the call of the
chairperson, but not less than quarterly.

(e) The members representing wireless providers,
the public utility providing telecommunications services and land line enhanced
911 services through section 269-16.95, and Interconnected Voice over Internet
Protocol service providers shall be appointed by the governor for terms of two
years.

(f) Each member shall hold office until the
member's successor is appointed and qualified. Section 26-34 shall apply only
insofar as it relates to succession, vacancies, and suspension of board
members, and as provided in subsection (a).

(g) The board may adopt rules under chapter 91
as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(h) The members shall serve without
compensation. Members shall be entitled to reimbursements from the enhanced
911 fund for reasonable traveling expenses incurred in connection with the
performance of board duties.

(i) The board or its chairperson, with the
approval of the board, may employ an executive director exempt from chapters 76
and 89, and other staff, and may retain independent, third-party accounting
firms, consultants, or other third party to:

(1) Create reports, make payments into the fund,
process checks, and make distributions from the fund, as directed by the board
and as allowed by this chapter; and

(2) Perform administrative duties necessary to administer
the fund or oversee operations of the board, including providing technical
advisory support; provided that no employee, third-party accounting firm,
consultant, or other third party hired to perform these administrative duties
may be retained if the employee, accounting firm, consultant, or other third
party, either directly or indirectly, has a conflict of interest or is
affiliated with the management of or owns a pecuniary interest in any entity
subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(j) The board shall develop reasonable
procedures to ensure that all members receive adequate notice of board meetings
and information concerning board decisions. [L 2004, c 159, pt of §2; am L
2005, c 49, §1; am L 2008, c 22, §2; am L 2011, c 168, pt of §1; am L 2013, c
22, §1; am L 2015, c 178, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next